Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2913
Designated office and agent for service of process.

(1) A limited cooperative association and a foreign limited cooperative association shall designate and continuously maintain in this state:

(a) An office, which need not be a place of its activity in this state; and

(b) An agent for service of process.

(2) An agent for service of process of a limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association shall be an individual who is a resident of this state or other person authorized to do business in this state.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 13.